Connecticut, session 2026, HB05164.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. Subsection (c) of section 4-28e of the general statutes is
repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July 1,
2026):
(c) Commencing with the fiscal year ending June 30, 2023, until June
30, 2025, annual disbursements from the Tobacco Settlement Fund shall
be made as follows: (1) To the Tobacco and Health Trust Fund in an
amount equal to twelve million dollars; and (2) the remainder to the
General Fund. [; except that for] For the fiscal year ending June 30, [2025]
2026, [the] such annual [disbursement from the Tobacco Settlement
Fund] disbursements shall be made to the General Fund. Commencing
with the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, annual disbursements from
said fund shall be made as follows: (A) To the Tobacco and Health Trust
Fund in an amount equal to thirty-two million dollars; and (B) the
remainder to the General Fund.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 July 1, 2026 4-28e(c)
LCO 1 of 2

Substitute Bill No. 5164
PH Joint Favorable Subst.
LCO 2 of 2